Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3808
Home studies; other steps to ensure minor's welfare; department; duties.

(1) Upon notification to a consulate pursuant to section 43-3804, the department shall request that the consulate obtain through the agency the appropriate home studies of potential families in such country who may be involved in the case and forward the information to the departmental caseworker directly responsible for the case.

(2) When a foreign national minor is placed in his or her country or a minor having multiple nationalities is placed in the country other than the United States in which he or she holds citizenship, the department shall take all steps necessary to obtain the cooperation of the consulate and the agency to ensure the minor's welfare and provide whatever services are needed. The department shall request copies of the monitoring reports prepared by the agency concerning the welfare of the minor.

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 8;

Laws 2008, LB92, § 8.